Utah statutes.
73-4-23.   Effective date of amendatory act -- Application to pending suits -- State engineer's certificate.

This act shall be effective 60 days from its enactment and shall apply to all suits now pending under Title 73, Chapter 4, Utah Code Annotated 1953, except those proceedings under which the state engineer has by the effective date hereof completed his survey, and it is expressly provided that those actions where the state engineer has by the effective date of this act completed his survey may proceed to completion under the procedure prescribed by the statutes heretofore existing. The state engineer shall within 10 days after the effective date of this act file with the clerk of the court in each action then pending under Title 73, Chapter 4, Utah Code Annotated 1953, a certificate under the seal of his office stating whether or not he has completed the survey so that all persons will have notice and can know whether or not this act is applicable to such existing suit.



No Change Since 1953

